Idaho, session 2025, S1080.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 6, Title 48, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 48-603H, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
48-603H. VETERANS BENEFITS CONSUMER PROTECTIONS. (1) As used in this
section:
(a) "Compensation" means a payment of any money, thing of value, or fi-
nancial benefit.
(b) "Veterans benefits matter" means the preparation, presentation, or
prosecution of any claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed
an intent to file a claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity,
function, or status to which entitlement is determined under the laws
and regulations administered by the United States department of veter-
ans affairs, the United States department of defense, or the Idaho divi-
sion of veterans services pertaining to veterans, veterans' dependents
or survivors, or any other individual eligible for such benefit, pro-
gram, service, commodity, function, or status.
(2)(a) Except as permitted under federal law, no person shall re-
ceive compensation for preparing, presenting, prosecuting, advising,
consulting, or assisting any individual with regard to any veterans
benefits matter before the United States department of veterans af-
fairs, the United States department of defense, or the Idaho division of
veterans services.
(b) No person shall receive compensation for referring any individual
to another person to prepare, present, prosecute, advise, consult, or
assist regarding any veterans benefits matter before the United States
department of veterans affairs, the United States department of de-
fense, or the Idaho division of veterans services.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.